Utah statutes.
26-21a-204.   Mammogram provider certification.

(1) A mammogram may only be performed in a facility the department certifies as meeting:

(a)  the qualifications and standards under Section 26-21a-203; and

(b)  the registration, licensing, and inspection requirements for radiation sources under Section 19-3-104.

(2)  Facilities desiring to perform mammograms shall request certification as a mammogram provider by the department under procedures established by department rule.

